New York, session 2025-2026, A4503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of corrections and community supervision 2 is authorized and directed to study gender disparity in resources 3 provided to incarcerated individuals. Such study shall include, but not 4 be limited to: 5 (a) what resources are made available to incarcerated individuals; 6 (b) the amount of such resources made available to incarcerated indi- 7 viduals of each gender; 8 (c) the reasons for any disparities found between the amount of 9 resources made available to incarcerated individuals of each gender; 10 (d) recommendations on actions that may be taken to resolve any 11 disparities found between the amount of resources made available to 12 incarcerated individuals of each gender; and 13 (e) any other related information that the commissioner may deem 14 necessary or relevant in carrying out this study. 15 § 2. The commissioner of corrections and community supervision shall 16 make a report to the governor and the legislature of the findings, 17 conclusions and recommendations no later than one year after the effec- 18 tive date of this act and shall submit with this report such legislative 19 proposals as they deem necessary to implement their recommendations. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08556-01-5